data/source/lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4511 Y 46
SFX 4511 u u . 221
SFX 4511 u udu . 221
SFX 4511 u iejų . 222
SFX 4511 u iem . 223
SFX 4511 u iems . 224
SFX 4511 u u . 225
SFX 4511 u iem . 226
SFX 4511 u iejuose . 227
SFX 4511 u iejuos . 228
SFX 4511 u u . 229
SFX 4511 u i . 230
SFX 4511 u idvi . 230
SFX 4511 u iejų . 231
SFX 4511 u iem . 232
SFX 4511 u iems . 233
SFX 4511 u i . 234
SFX 4511 u iem . 235
SFX 4511 u iemis . 236
SFX 4511 u iejomis . 236
SFX 4511 u iejose . 237
SFX 4511 u i . 238
SFX 4511 u eji . 169
SFX 4511 u ejų . 170
SFX 4511 u ejiems . 171
SFX 4511 u ejiem . 172
SFX 4511 u ejus . 173
SFX 4511 u ejais . 174
SFX 4511 u ejuose . 175
SFX 4511 u ejuos . 176
SFX 4511 u eji . 177
SFX 4511 u ejos . 178
SFX 4511 u ejų . 179
SFX 4511 u ejoms . 180
SFX 4511 u ejom . 181
SFX 4511 u ejas . 182
SFX 4511 u ejomis . 183
SFX 4511 u ejom . 184
SFX 4511 u ejose . 185
SFX 4511 u ejos . 186
SFX 4511 u ejetas . 239
SFX 4511 u ejeto . 240
SFX 4511 u ejetui . 241
SFX 4511 u ejetą . 242
SFX 4511 u ejetu . 243
SFX 4511 u ejete . 244
SFX 4511 u ejete . 245

SFX 4521 Y 5
SFX 4521 u iejuosna . 246
SFX 4521 u iejosna . 247
SFX 4521 u ejuosna . 187
SFX 4521 u ejosna . 188
SFX 4521 u ejetan . 248

SFX 4562 Y 49
SFX 4562 is is dalis 38
SFX 4562 is io dalis 39
SFX 4562 is iui dalis 42
SFX 4562 is į dalis 43
SFX 4562 is iu dalis 44
SFX 4562 is yje dalis 45
SFX 4562 is y dalis 87
SFX 4562 is iai dalis 40
SFX 4562 is ių dalis 41
SFX 4562 is iams dalis 46
SFX 4562 is iam dalis 47
SFX 4562 is ius dalis 48
SFX 4562 is iais dalis 49
SFX 4562 is iuose dalis 50
SFX 4562 is iuos dalis 51
SFX 4562 ė ė ė 94
SFX 4562 ė ės ė 95
SFX 4562 ė ei ė 98
SFX 4562 ė ę ė 99
SFX 4562 ė e ė 100
SFX 4562 ė ėje ė 101
SFX 4562 ė ėj ė 102
SFX 4562 ė ės ė 96
SFX 4562 ė ių ė 97
SFX 4562 ė ėms ė 103
SFX 4562 ė ėm ė 104
SFX 4562 ė es ė 105
SFX 4562 ė ėmis ė 106
SFX 4562 ė ėm ė 107
SFX 4562 ė ėse ė 108
SFX 4562 is is tis 38
SFX 4562 tis čio tis 39
SFX 4562 tis čiui tis 42
SFX 4562 is į tis 43
SFX 4562 tis čiu tis 44
SFX 4562 is yje tis 45
SFX 4562 is y tis 87
SFX 4562 tis čiai tis 40
SFX 4562 tis čių tis 41
SFX 4562 tis čiams tis 46
SFX 4562 tis čiam tis 47
SFX 4562 tis čius tis 48
SFX 4562 tis čiais tis 49
SFX 4562 tis čiuose tis 50
SFX 4562 tis čiuos tis 51
SFX 4562 o o o 39
SFX 4562 o ų o 41
SFX 4562 o os o 95
SFX 4562 o ų o 97

SFX 4569 Y 6
SFX 4569 is i dalis 52
SFX 4569 is iai dalis 57
SFX 4569 ė e ė 109
SFX 4569 ė ės ė 110
SFX 4569 is i tis 52
SFX 4569 tis čiai tis 57

SFX 4570 Y 6
SFX 4570 is in dalis 54
SFX 4570 is iuosna dalis 55
SFX 4570 ė ėn ė 112
SFX 4570 ė ėsna ė 113
SFX 4570 is in tis 54
SFX 4570 tis čiuosna tis 55

SFX 4571 Y 3
SFX 4571 is iu dalis 56
SFX 4571 ė i ė 114
SFX 4571 tis čiu tis 56

SFX 4626 Y 34
SFX 4626 as as . 38
SFX 4626 as o . 39
SFX 4626 as am . 42
SFX 4626 as ą . 43
SFX 4626 as u . 44
SFX 4626 as ame . 45
SFX 4626 as am . 87
SFX 4626 as as . 52
SFX 4626 as i . 40
SFX 4626 as ų . 41
SFX 4626 as iems . 46
SFX 4626 as iem . 47
SFX 4626 as us . 48
SFX 4626 as ais . 49
SFX 4626 as uose . 50
SFX 4626 as uos . 51
SFX 4626 as i . 57
SFX 4626 as a . 94
SFX 4626 as os . 95
SFX 4626 as ai . 98
SFX 4626 as ą . 99
SFX 4626 as a . 100
SFX 4626 as oje . 101
SFX 4626 as oj . 102
SFX 4626 as a . 109
SFX 4626 as os . 96
SFX 4626 as ų . 97
SFX 4626 as oms . 103
SFX 4626 as om . 104
SFX 4626 as as . 105
SFX 4626 as omis . 106
SFX 4626 as om . 107
SFX 4626 as ose . 108
SFX 4626 as os . 110

SFX 4634 Y 4
SFX 4634 as an . 54
SFX 4634 as uosna . 55
SFX 4634 as on . 112
SFX 4634 as osna . 113

SFX 4635 Y 2
SFX 4635 as u . 56
SFX 4635 as i . 114

SFX 4666 Y 1
SFX 4666 as a . 147

SFX 4667 Y 1
SFX 4667 as asis/518 . 151

SFX 4668 Y 1
SFX 4668 as asis/519 . 151

SFX 4669 Y 1
SFX 4669 as asis/520 . 151

SFX 4670 Y 34
SFX 4670 as as . 38
SFX 4670 as o . 39
SFX 4670 as am . 42
SFX 4670 as ą . 43
SFX 4670 as u . 44
SFX 4670 as ame . 45
SFX 4670 as am . 87
SFX 4670 as as . 52
SFX 4670 čias ti . 40
SFX 4670 as ų . 41
SFX 4670 čias tiems . 46
SFX 4670 čias tiem . 47
SFX 4670 as us . 48
SFX 4670 as ais . 49
SFX 4670 as uose . 50
SFX 4670 as uos . 51
SFX 4670 čias ti . 57
SFX 4670 as a . 94
SFX 4670 as os . 95
SFX 4670 as ai . 98
SFX 4670 as ą . 99
SFX 4670 as a . 100
SFX 4670 as oje . 101
SFX 4670 as oj . 102
SFX 4670 as a . 109
SFX 4670 as os . 96
SFX 4670 as ų . 97
SFX 4670 as oms . 103
SFX 4670 as om . 104
SFX 4670 as as . 105
SFX 4670 as omis . 106
SFX 4670 as om . 107
SFX 4670 as ose . 108
SFX 4670 as os . 110

SFX 4678 Y 4
SFX 4678 as an . 54
SFX 4678 as uosna . 55
SFX 4678 as on . 112
SFX 4678 as osna . 113

SFX 4679 Y 2
SFX 4679 as u . 56
SFX 4679 čias ti . 114

SFX 4710 Y 1
SFX 4710 as a . 147

SFX 4711 Y 2
SFX 4711 as asis/518 . 151
SFX 4711 čias tysis/518 . 151

SFX 4712 Y 2
SFX 4712 as asis/519 . 151
SFX 4712 čias tysis/519 . 151

SFX 4713 Y 2
SFX 4713 as asis/520 . 151
SFX 4713 čias tysis/520 . 151

SFX 4717 Y 34
SFX 4717 as as . 58
SFX 4717 as o . 59
SFX 4717 as am . 60
SFX 4717 as ą . 61
SFX 4717 as u . 62
SFX 4717 as ame . 63
SFX 4717 as am . 88
SFX 4717 as as . 64
SFX 4717 as i . 141
SFX 4717 as ų . 249
SFX 4717 as iems . 145
SFX 4717 as iem . 250
SFX 4717 as us . 142
SFX 4717 as ais . 146
SFX 4717 as uose . 251
SFX 4717 as uos . 252
SFX 4717 as i . 165
SFX 4717 as a . 115
SFX 4717 as os . 116
SFX 4717 as ai . 117
SFX 4717 as ą . 118
SFX 4717 as a . 119
SFX 4717 as oje . 120
SFX 4717 as oj . 121
SFX 4717 as a . 122
SFX 4717 as os . 253
SFX 4717 as ų . 254
SFX 4717 as oms . 255
SFX 4717 as om . 256
SFX 4717 as as . 257
SFX 4717 as omis . 258
SFX 4717 as om . 259
SFX 4717 as ose . 260
SFX 4717 as os . 261

SFX 4725 Y 4
SFX 4725 as an . 66
SFX 4725 as uosna . 262
SFX 4725 as on . 124
SFX 4725 as osna . 263

SFX 4755 Y 1
SFX 4755 as a . 264

SFX 4756 Y 1
SFX 4756 as asis/518 . 151

SFX 4757 Y 1
SFX 4757 as asis/519 . 151

SFX 4758 Y 1
SFX 4758 as asis/520 . 151

SFX 4759 Y 34
SFX 4759 aš aš . 265
SFX 4759 aš manęs . 266
SFX 4759 aš mano . 267
SFX 4759 aš man . 268
SFX 4759 aš mane . 269
SFX 4759 aš manimi . 270
SFX 4759 aš manim . 271
SFX 4759 aš manyje . 272
SFX 4759 aš manyj . 273
SFX 4759 aš many . 273
SFX 4759 aš mudu . 274
SFX 4759 aš mudviejų . 275
SFX 4759 aš mudviem . 276
SFX 4759 aš mudviems . 277
SFX 4759 aš mudu . 278
SFX 4759 aš mudviem . 279
SFX 4759 aš mudviejuose . 280
SFX 4759 aš mudviejuos . 281
SFX 4759 aš mudvi . 282
SFX 4759 aš mudviejų . 283
SFX 4759 aš mudviem . 284
SFX 4759 aš mudviems . 285
SFX 4759 aš mudvi . 286
SFX 4759 aš mudviem . 287
SFX 4759 aš mudviejose . 288
SFX 4759 aš mes . 289
SFX 4759 aš mūsų . 290
SFX 4759 aš mūs . 291
SFX 4759 aš mums . 292
SFX 4759 aš mum . 293
SFX 4759 aš mus . 294
SFX 4759 aš mumis . 295
SFX 4759 aš mumyse . 296
SFX 4759 aš mūsuose . 296

SFX 4769 Y 2
SFX 4769 aš manin . 297
SFX 4769 aš mumysna . 298

SFX 4795 Y 33
SFX 4795 tu tu . 265
SFX 4795 tu tavęs . 266
SFX 4795 tu tavo . 267
SFX 4795 tu tau . 268
SFX 4795 tu tave . 269
SFX 4795 tu tavimi . 270
SFX 4795 tu tavim . 271
SFX 4795 tu tavyje . 272
SFX 4795 tu tavyj . 273
SFX 4795 tu tavy . 273
SFX 4795 tu judu . 274
SFX 4795 tu judviejų . 275
SFX 4795 tu judviem . 276
SFX 4795 tu judviems . 277
SFX 4795 tu judu . 278
SFX 4795 tu judviem . 279
SFX 4795 tu judviejuose . 280
SFX 4795 tu judviejuos . 281
SFX 4795 tu judvi . 282
SFX 4795 tu judviejų . 283
SFX 4795 tu judviem . 284
SFX 4795 tu judviems . 285
SFX 4795 tu judvi . 286
SFX 4795 tu judviem . 287
SFX 4795 tu judviejose . 288
SFX 4795 tu jūs . 289
SFX 4795 tu jūsų . 290
SFX 4795 tu jūs . 291
SFX 4795 tu jums . 292
SFX 4795 tu jum . 293
SFX 4795 tu jus . 294
SFX 4795 tu jumis . 295
SFX 4795 tu jumyse . 296

SFX 4805 Y 2
SFX 4805 tu tavin . 297
SFX 4805 tu jumysna . 298

SFX 4830 Y 9
SFX 4830 vęs vęs . 299
SFX 4830 vęs vo . 300
SFX 4830 vęs u . 301
SFX 4830 vęs ve . 302
SFX 4830 vęs vimi . 303
SFX 4830 vęs vim . 304
SFX 4830 vęs vyje . 305
SFX 4830 vęs vyj . 306
SFX 4830 vęs vy . 306

SFX 4839 Y 1
SFX 4839 vęs vin . 307

SFX 4840 Y 65
SFX 4840 as as . 38
SFX 4840 as ai tas 147
SFX 4840 as atai tas 308
SFX 4840 as at tas 309
SFX 4840 as o . 39
SFX 4840 as am . 42
SFX 4840 as ą . 43
SFX 4840 as uo . 44
SFX 4840 as uom . 62
SFX 4840 as ame . 45
SFX 4840 as am . 87
SFX 4840 as as . 52
SFX 4840 as uodu . 274
SFX 4840 as iedu . 167
SFX 4840 as ųdviejų . 275
SFX 4840 as iemdviem . 276
SFX 4840 as iedviem . 276
SFX 4840 as iemdviems . 310
SFX 4840 as iedviems . 310
SFX 4840 as uodu . 278
SFX 4840 as iemdviem . 279
SFX 4840 as iedviem . 279
SFX 4840 as uodviejuose . 280
SFX 4840 as uodviejuos . 281
SFX 4840 as iedviejuose . 311
SFX 4840 as iedviejuos . 312
SFX 4840 as uodviese . 311
SFX 4840 as ie . 40
SFX 4840 as ų . 41
SFX 4840 as iems . 46
SFX 4840 as iem . 47
SFX 4840 as uos . 48
SFX 4840 as ais . 49
SFX 4840 as uose . 50
SFX 4840 as uos . 51
SFX 4840 as ie . 57
SFX 4840 as a . 94
SFX 4840 as os . 95
SFX 4840 as ai . 98
SFX 4840 as ą . 99
SFX 4840 as a . 100
SFX 4840 as oje . 101
SFX 4840 as oj . 102
SFX 4840 as a . 109
SFX 4840 as iedvi . 282
SFX 4840 as odvi . 168
SFX 4840 as uodvi . 168
SFX 4840 as ųdviejų . 283
SFX 4840 as omdviem . 284
SFX 4840 as odviem . 284
SFX 4840 as omdviems . 313
SFX 4840 as odviems . 313
SFX 4840 as iedvi . 286
SFX 4840 as omdviem . 287
SFX 4840 as odviem . 287
SFX 4840 as iedviejose . 288
SFX 4840 as os . 96
SFX 4840 as ų . 97
SFX 4840 as oms . 103
SFX 4840 as om . 104
SFX 4840 as as . 105
SFX 4840 as omis . 106
SFX 4840 as om . 107
SFX 4840 as ose . 108
SFX 4840 as os . 110

SFX 4852 Y 4
SFX 4852 as an . 54
SFX 4852 as uosna . 55
SFX 4852 as on . 112
SFX 4852 as osna . 113

SFX 4909 Y 1
SFX 4909 as asai/527 . 151

SFX 4910 Y 1
SFX 4910 as asai/528 . 151

SFX 4911 Y 10
SFX 4911 as as . 314
SFX 4911 as s iekas 315
SFX 4911 as o . 299
SFX 4911 as ieno . 300
SFX 4911 as am . 301
SFX 4911 as ą . 302
SFX 4911 as uo . 303
SFX 4911 as uom . 316
SFX 4911 as ame . 305
SFX 4911 as am . 317

SFX 4921 Y 26
SFX 4921 as as . 38
SFX 4921 as o . 39
SFX 4921 as am . 42
SFX 4921 as ą . 43
SFX 4921 as u . 44
SFX 4921 as ame . 45
SFX 4921 as ai . 40
SFX 4921 as ų . 41
SFX 4921 as ams . 46
SFX 4921 as us . 48
SFX 4921 as ais . 49
SFX 4921 as uose . 50
SFX 4921 as a . 94
SFX 4921 as os . 95
SFX 4921 as ai . 98
SFX 4921 as ą . 99
SFX 4921 as a . 100
SFX 4921 as oje . 101
SFX 4921 as os . 96
SFX 4921 as ų . 97
SFX 4921 as oms . 103
SFX 4921 as om . 318
SFX 4921 as as . 105
SFX 4921 as omis . 106
SFX 4921 as om . 319
SFX 4921 as ose . 108

SFX 4947 Y 37
SFX 4947 as as . 38
SFX 4947 as s kitas 320
SFX 4947 as s vienas 320
SFX 4947 as o . 39
SFX 4947 as am . 42
SFX 4947 as ą . 43
SFX 4947 as u . 44
SFX 4947 as ame . 45
SFX 4947 as am . 87
SFX 4947 as as . 52
SFX 4947 as i . 40
SFX 4947 as ų . 41
SFX 4947 as iems . 46
SFX 4947 as iem . 47
SFX 4947 as us . 48
SFX 4947 as ais . 49
SFX 4947 as uose . 50
SFX 4947 as uos . 51
SFX 4947 as i . 57
SFX 4947 as a . 94
SFX 4947 as os . 95
SFX 4947 as ai . 98
SFX 4947 as ą . 99
SFX 4947 as a . 100
SFX 4947 as oje . 101
SFX 4947 as oj . 102
SFX 4947 as a . 109
SFX 4947 as os . 96
SFX 4947 as ų . 97
SFX 4947 as oms . 103
SFX 4947 as om . 104
SFX 4947 as as . 105
SFX 4947 as omis . 106
SFX 4947 as om . 107
SFX 4947 as ose . 108
SFX 4947 as os . 110
SFX 4947 as a . 147

SFX 4957 Y 4
SFX 4957 as an . 54
SFX 4957 as uosna . 55
SFX 4957 as on . 112
SFX 4957 as osna . 113

SFX 4958 Y 2
SFX 4958 as u . 56
SFX 4958 as i . 125

SFX 4990 Y 1
SFX 4990 as asai/527 . 151

SFX 4991 Y 1
SFX 4991 as asai/528 . 151
